Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1860YH (3) 91 cm/jh H.F. 106 Section 1. Section 611.20, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 611.20 Actions survive. 3 1. All causes of action shall survive and may be brought 4 notwithstanding the death of the person entitled or liable to 5 the same cause of action . 6 2. For the purposes of the survival of, and the bringing 7 of a cause of action for, wrongful death of an unborn child 8 under subsection 1, âpersonâ includes the unborn child. For the 9 purposes of this subsection, âunborn childâ means the same as 10 defined in section 146A.l. 11